Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 7. Professional Corporations.

Research References.

Professional Corporations and Associations (Matthew Bender). Chapter 8 Professional Corporation or Association under State Law. § § 8.01 Overview of Professional Corporations. Eaton.

§ 13.1-542.
Repealed by Acts 2022 c. 234, cl. 2.

History.

Former §

13.1-542

regarding legislative intent was derived from Acts 1970, c. 77; repealed by 2022, c. 234.

§ 13.1-542.1.
Practice of certain professions by corporations.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law or regulation, the professional services defined in subsection A of §

13.1-543

may be rendered in this Commonwealth by:

A corporation organized as a professional corporation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

A foreign corporation that has obtained a certificate of authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

A corporation organized pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) or Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of this title; or

A foreign corporation that has obtained a certificate of authority pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) or Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of this title.

History.

2003, c. 678.

Effective date.

This section became effective March 19, 2003.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

§ 13.1-543.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:“Eligible employee stock ownership plan” means an employee stock ownership plan as such term is defined in § 4975(e)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, sponsored by a professional corporation and with respect to which:

All of the trustees of the employee stock ownership plan are individuals who are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the professional services for which the professional corporation is organized under this chapter; however, if a conflict of interest exists for one or more trustees with respect to a specific issue or transaction, such trustees may appoint a special independent trustee or special fiduciary, who is not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the professional services for which the professional corporation is organized under this chapter, which special independent trustee shall be authorized to make decisions only with respect to the specific issue or transaction that is the subject of the conflict;

The employee stock ownership plan provides that no shares, fractional shares, or rights or options to purchase shares of the professional corporation shall at any time be issued, sold, or otherwise transferred directly to anyone other than an individual duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the professional services for which the professional corporation is organized under this chapter, unless such shares are transferred as a plan distribution to a plan beneficiary and subject to immediate repurchase by the professional corporation, the employee stock ownership plan or another person authorized to hold such shares; however:

With respect to a professional corporation rendering the professional services of public accounting or certified public accounting:

The employee stock ownership plan may permit individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render these services to participate in such plan, provided such individuals are employees of the corporation and hold less than a majority of the beneficial interests in such plan; and

At least 51 percent of the total of allocated and unallocated equity interests in the corporation sponsoring such employee stock ownership plan are held (i) by the trustees of such employee stock ownership plan for the benefit of persons holding a valid CPA certificate as defined in §

54.1-4400

, with unallocated shares allocated for these purposes pursuant to § 409(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or (ii) by individual employees holding a valid CPA certificate separate from any interests held by such employee stock ownership plan; and

With respect to a professional corporation rendering the professional services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, landscape architects, or certified interior designers, the employee stock ownership plan may permit individuals who are not duly licensed to render the services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects, or individuals legally authorized to use the title of certified interior designers to participate in such plan, provided such individuals are employees of the corporation and together hold not more than one-third of the beneficial interests in such plan, and that the total of the shares (i) held by individuals who are employees but not duly licensed to render such services or legally authorized to use a title and (ii) held by the trustees of such employee stock ownership plan for the benefit of individuals who are employees but not duly licensed to render such services or legally authorized to use a title, shall not exceed one-third of the shares of the corporation; and

The professional corporation, the trustees of the employee stock ownership plan, and the other shareholders of the professional corporation comply with the foregoing provisions of the plan.“Professional business entity” means any entity as defined in §

13.1-603

that is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized under the laws of the Commonwealth or the laws of the jurisdiction under whose laws the entity is formed to render the same professional service as that for which a professional corporation or professional limited liability company may be organized, including, but not limited to, (i) a professional limited liability company as defined in §

13.1-1102

, (ii) a professional corporation as defined in this subsection, or (iii) a partnership that is registered as a registered limited liability partnership registered under §

50-73.132

, all of the partners of which are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services as those for which the partnership was organized.“Professional corporation” means a corporation whose articles of incorporation set forth a sole and specific purpose permitted by this chapter and that is either (i) organized under this chapter for the sole and specific purpose of rendering professional service other than that of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects, or using a title other than that of certified interior designers and, except as expressly otherwise permitted by this chapter, that has as its shareholders or members only individuals or professional business entities that are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional service as the corporation, including the trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan or (ii) organized under this chapter for the sole and specific purpose of rendering the professional services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects, or using the title of certified interior designers, or any combination thereof, and at least two-thirds of whose shares are held by persons duly licensed within the Commonwealth to perform the services of an architect, professional engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect, including the trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan, or by persons legally authorized within the Commonwealth to use the title of certified interior designer; or (iii) organized under this chapter or under Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) for the sole and specific purpose of rendering the professional services of one or more practitioners of the healing arts, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

54.1-2900

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or one or more nurse practitioners, licensed under Chapter 29 (§

54.1-2900

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or one or more optometrists licensed under the provisions of Chapter 32 (§

54.1-3200

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or one or more physical therapists and physical therapist assistants licensed under the provisions of Chapter 34.1 (§

54.1-3473

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or one or more practitioners of the behavioral science professions, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 35 (§

54.1-3500

et seq.), 36 (§

54.1-3600

et seq.) or 37 (§

54.1-3700

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or one or more practitioners of audiology or speech pathology, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 26 (§

54.1-2600

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or one or more clinical nurse specialists who render mental health services licensed under Chapter 30 (§

54.1-3000

et seq.) of Title 54.1 and registered with the Board of Nursing, or any combination of practitioners of the healing arts, optometry, physical therapy, the behavioral science professions, and audiology or speech pathology, and all of whose shares are held by or all of whose members are individuals or professional business entities duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to perform the services of a practitioner of the healing arts, nurse practitioners, optometry, physical therapy, the behavioral science professions, audiology or speech pathology or of a clinical nurse specialist, including the trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan; however, nothing herein shall be construed so as to allow any member of the healing arts, optometry, physical therapy, the behavioral science professions, audiology or speech pathology or a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist to conduct his practice in a manner contrary to the standards of ethics of his branch of the healing arts, optometry, physical therapy, the behavioral science professions, audiology or speech pathology, or nursing, as the case may be.“Professional service” means any type of personal service to the public that requires as a condition precedent to the rendering of such service or use of such title the obtaining of a license, certification, or other legal authorization and shall be limited to the personal services rendered by pharmacists, optometrists, physical therapists and physical therapist assistants, practitioners of the healing arts, nurse practitioners, practitioners of the behavioral science professions, veterinarians, surgeons, dentists, architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, landscape architects, certified interior designers, public accountants, certified public accountants, attorneys-at-law, insurance consultants, audiologists or speech pathologists, and clinical nurse specialists. For the purposes of this chapter, the following shall be deemed to be rendering the same professional service:

Architects, professional engineers, and land surveyors; and

Practitioners of the healing arts, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 29 (§ 54.1-2900 et seq.) of Title 54.1; nurse practitioners, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 29 (§ 54.1-2900 et seq.) of Title 54.1; optometrists, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 32 (§

54.1-3200

et seq.) of Title 54.1; physical therapists and physical therapist assistants, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 34.1 (§

54.1-3473

et seq.) of Title 54.1; practitioners of the behavioral science professions, licensed under the provisions of Chapters 35 (§

54.1-3500

et seq.), 36 (§

54.1-3600

et seq.), and 37 (§

54.1-3700

et seq.) of Title 54.1; and one or more clinical nurse specialists who render mental health services, licensed under Chapter 30 (§

54.1-3000

et seq.) of Title 54.1 and are registered with the Board of Nursing.

Persons who practice the healing art of performing professional clinical laboratory services within a hospital pathology laboratory shall be legally authorized to do so for purposes of this chapter if such persons (i) hold a doctorate degree in the biological sciences or a board certification in the clinical laboratory sciences and (ii) are tenured faculty members of an accredited medical school that is an “institution” as that term is defined in §

23.1-1100

.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1972, c. 180; 1980, cc. 701, 757; 1981, c. 217; 1985, c. 576; 1989, c. 665; 1990, cc. 481, 595; 1992, cc. 13, 16; 1994, c. 349; 1999, c. 83; 2000, cc. 194, 688, 763; 2003, c. 678; 2006, cc. 672, 715; 2008, c. 265; 2009, c. 309; 2017, c. 314; 2020, c. 726.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 672 and 715, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board for Accountancy shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-1101” was substituted for “23-14” in subsection B to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, inserted “nurse practitioners” in the first sentence and inserted “nurse practitioners, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

54.1-2900

et seq.) of Title 54.1” in subdivision 2; and inserted “or one or more nurse practitioners licensed under Chapter 29 (§

54.1-2900

et seq.) of Title 54.1” in clause (iii) of subsection B.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 194, in subsection B, substituted “a corporation whose articles of incorporation set forth a sole and specific purpose permitted by this chapter and which is either (i) organized” for “(i) a corporation organized,” and at the beginning of clauses (ii) and (iii), deleted “a corporation which is.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 688 inserted “physical therapists and physical therapist assistants, licensed under the provisions of Chapter 34.1 (§

54.1-3473

et seq.) of Title 54.1” in subdivision A 2; in subsection B, near the middle, inserted “or one or more physical therapists and physical therapist assistants licensed under the provisions of Chapter 34.1 (§

54.1-3473

et seq.) of Title 54.1,” and inserted “physical therapy” following “optometry” in four places.

The 2000 amendment by c. 763 inserted “certified interior designers” in subsection A; and in subsection B, in clause (i), substituted “using a title other than that of certified landscape architects or certified interior designers” for “certified landscape architects,” in clause (ii), substituted “using the title of certified landscape architects or certified interior designers” for “certified landscape architects,” deleted “or otherwise legally authorized” following “duly licensed,” and substituted “or by persons legally authorized within the Commonwealth to use the title of certified landscape architect or certified interior designer” for “certified landscape architect,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 678, effective March 19, 2003, inserted the subsection A designator preceding the formerly undesignated introductory clause; deleted the former subsection A and B designators preceding the paragraphs defining “professional service” and “professional corporation”; redesignated former subsection C as present subsection B; and near the end of the paragraph defining “professional corporation” in subsection A, inserted “nurse practitioners” following “healing arts” substituted “professions, audiology” for “professions, or audiology” three times, and inserted “nurse practitioner or” preceding “clinical nurse.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 672 and 715 are identical, and rewrote this section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 265, in subsection A, added the definition of “Professional business entity”; and in the definition of “Professional corporation” in clause (i), inserted “or members” following “that has as its shareholders,” substituted “or professional business entities that” for “who themselves,” and deleted “and of which shareholders at least one is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional service within the Commonwealth” following “an eligible employee stock ownership plan” and substituted “individuals or professional business entities” for “persons” in clause (iii).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 309, in subdivision 2 b, near the beginning, deleted “certified” preceding “landscape architects,” near the middle, inserted “or landscape architects,” made a related change and deleted “certified landscape architects or” following “use the title of”; in the paragraph defining “Professional corporation,” in clauses (i) and (ii), inserted “or landscape architects,” made a related change and deleted “certified landscape architects or” preceding “certified interior designers” three times; and in the paragraph defining “Professional service,” deleted “certified” preceding “landscape architects.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “medical school that is an ‘institution’ as that term is defined in §

23.1-1100

” for “medical college or university that is an ‘educational institution’ within the meaning of §

23.1-1101

” in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 726 deleted “who renders mental health services” following the first instance of “specialist” in clause (iii) of the definition of “Professional corporation” in the definition of “Professional corporation” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1412 (1973).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1370 (1976).

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

for the year 2000, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For 2006 survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-544.
Who may organize and become shareholder.

An individual or group of individuals (i) duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services other than those of architects, professional engineers or land surveyors, or to use a title other than those of certified landscape architects or certified interior designers, of which at least one is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within the Commonwealth, or (ii) complying with the provisions of §

13.1-549

and duly licensed to render within the Commonwealth the professional services of architects, professional engineers or land surveyors, or legally authorized to use within the Commonwealth the title of certified landscape architects or certified interior designers, or any combination thereof, may organize a professional corporation for pecuniary profit under the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title or organize a professional corporation as a nonstock corporation under the provisions of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of this title, for the sole and specific purpose of rendering the same and specific professional service, subject to any laws, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, which are applicable to the practice of that profession in the corporate form.

An eligible employee stock ownership plan or any individual or group of individuals described in clause (i) or (ii) of subsection A may become a shareholder or shareholders of a professional corporation for pecuniary profit under the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title, for the sole and specific purpose of rendering the same and specific professional service, subject to any laws, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, that are applicable to the practice of that profession in the corporate form.

Any individual or group of individuals described in clause (i) or (ii) of subsection A may become a member or members of a professional corporation organized as a nonstock corporation under the provisions of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of this title for the sole and specific purpose of rendering such professional services, subject to any laws, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, that are applicable to the practice of that profession in the corporate form.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1981, c. 58; 1989, c. 665; 1994, c. 349; 2000, c. 763; 2006, cc. 672, 715.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 672 and 715, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board for Accountancy shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 763, in clause (i), substituted “to use a title other than those of certified landscape architects or certified interior designers” for “certified landscape architects,” and in clause (ii), deleted “or otherwise legally authorized” preceding “to render,” and inserted “legally authorized to use within the Commonwealth the title of” preceding “certified landscape architects” and inserted “or certified interior designers” thereafter, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 672 and 715 are identical, and added the subsection designations; in subsection A, deleted “and become a shareholder or shareholders of” following “may organize”
and substituted “organize a professional corporation as” for “become a member or members of”; added subsection B; and in subsection C, added the language beginning “Any individual or group” and ending “organized as a,” substituted “under the provisions of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of this title” for “so organized,” “subject to any laws, not inconsistent with the provisions of” for “shall be subject to all limitations and restrictions imposed by” and added “that are applicable to the practice of that profession in the corporate form.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§ 13.1-544.1.
Use of initials “P.C.” or “PC” in corporate name.

Any professional corporation as defined in §

13.1-543

may, but is not required to, use the initials “P.C.” or “PC,” or the phrase “professional corporation” or “a professional corporation,” at the end of its corporate name. Such initials or phrase may be used in the place of any word or abbreviation required by subsection A of §

13.1-630

.

History.

1972, c. 577; 1973, c. 136; 1981, c. 58; 2002, c. 77; 2003, cc. 592, 678.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 77 rewrote the section.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, deleted “but shall not be considered in determining whether a corporate name is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission” at the end.

The 2003 amendment by c. 678, effective March 19, 2003, deleted “subsection B of” preceding “§

13.1-543

.”

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-544.2.
Certificate of authority for foreign professional corporations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a foreign professional corporation, organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth of Virginia to perform a professional service of the type defined in subsection A of §

13.1-543

, may apply for and obtain a certificate of authority to render such professional services in Virginia on the following terms and conditions:

Only stockholders and employees licensed or otherwise legally qualified by this Commonwealth may perform the professional service in Virginia.

The professional corporation must meet every requirement of this chapter except the requirement that its stockholders be licensed to perform the professional service in this Commonwealth.

The powers of any foreign professional corporation admitted under this section shall not exceed the powers permitted to domestic professional corporations under this chapter.

In order to qualify, a foreign professional corporation shall make application to the Commission as provided in §

13.1-759

and shall make such application for and secure a certificate of authority as may be required by §

13.1-549

; and, in addition, shall be required to set forth the name and address of each stockholder of the corporation who will be providing the professional service in this Commonwealth and whether such stockholder is licensed, or otherwise legally qualified, to perform the professional service in Virginia.

History.

1978, c. 674; 2002, c. 77; 2003, c. 678.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 77 substituted “subsection A of §

13.1-543

” for “subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-543

” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 678, effective March 19, 2003, deleted “all of” preceding “its stockholders” in subdivision A 2.

§ 13.1-545.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 765, effective January 1, 1989.

§ 13.1-545.1.
Merger with foreign professional corporation or foreign professional limited liability company.

Any corporation organized under this chapter may merge with one or more foreign professional corporations that have obtained a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth pursuant to §

13.1-544.2

, or one or more foreign professional limited liability companies that have obtained a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth pursuant to §

13.1-1105

, only if the professional corporations and the professional limited liability companies are organized to render the same professional service, provided that (i) the merger is permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction under which each such foreign professional corporation or foreign professional limited liability company is organized, (ii) if the surviving or new professional business entity is a professional corporation organized and operating under the laws of the Commonwealth, all of its shareholders shall be licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional service as the corporation, provided that if such service is that of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors or certified landscape architects, or any combination thereof, at least two-thirds of its shares shall be held by individuals who are licensed or otherwise legally authorized within the Commonwealth to render the applicable service, and (iii) if the surviving or new professional business entity is a professional limited liability company organized and operating under the laws of the Commonwealth, all of its members and managers shall be licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional service as the professional limited liability company, provided that if such service is that of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors or certified landscape architects, or any combination thereof, at least two-thirds of its membership interests shall be held by individuals or professional business entities that are licensed or otherwise legally authorized within the Commonwealth to render the applicable service.

History.

1978, c. 674; 1987, c. 425; 1994, c. 349; 2008, c. 509.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 rewrote the section, which read: “Any corporation organized under this chapter may merge or consolidate with a foreign professional corporation which has qualified to do business in this Commonwealth pursuant to §

13.1-544.2

only if both corporations are organized to render the same professional service; provided that (i) such merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which such foreign professional corporation is organized, and (ii) if the surviving or new professional corporation is organized and operating under the laws of Virginia, all stockholders of such remaining professional corporation shall be licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional service as the corporation, provided that if such service is that of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors or certified landscape architects, or any combination thereof, at least two-thirds of such stockholders shall be licensed or otherwise legally authorized within this Commonwealth to render the applicable service.”

§ 13.1-546.
How corporation may render professional services; nonprofessional employees and officers; organizers and shareholders need not be employees, etc.

No corporation organized and incorporated under this chapter may render professional services except through its officers, employees, independent contractors, and agents who are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services, and only shareholders, officers, employees, independent contractors, and agents licensed or otherwise legally qualified by this Commonwealth may perform the professional service in Virginia; provided, however, this provision shall not be interpreted to preclude clerks, secretaries, bookkeepers, technicians and other assistants who are not usually and ordinarily considered by custom and practice to be rendering professional service to the public for which a license or other legal authorization is required from acting as employees of a professional corporation and performing their usual duties or from acting as officers of a professional corporation; and provided further that nothing contained in this chapter shall be interpreted to require that the right of an individual to be a shareholder of a corporation organized under this chapter, or to organize such a corporation, is dependent upon the present or future existence of an employment relationship between him and such corporation, or his present or future active participation in any capacity in the production of the income of such corporation or in the performance of the services rendered by such corporations.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1994, c. 349; 2003, c. 786.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 786 inserted “independent contractors” in two places near the beginning of the section.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1370 (1976).

§ 13.1-546.1.
Professional law corporations may qualify as executor, administrator or in other fiduciary capacity.

A professional corporation engaged in the practice of law, as a part of the practice of law, may act as an executor, trustee or administrator of an estate, or guardian for an infant, or in any other fiduciary capacity. Any officer, employee or agent of a professional corporation engaged in the practice of law who is duly licensed as an attorney in the Commonwealth may perform necessary fiduciary responsibilities on behalf of the corporation.

History.

1989, c. 154.

Law Review.

For survey on wills, trusts, and estates in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 859 (1989).

§ 13.1-547.
Professional relationships not affected; liability for debts, etc., of corporation, its directors, officers and employees.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to alter or affect the professional relationship between a person furnishing professional services and a person receiving such service either with respect to liability arising out of such professional service or the confidential relationship between the person rendering the professional service and the person receiving such professional service, if any, and all such confidential relationships enjoyed under the laws of this Commonwealth, whether now in existence, or hereafter enacted, shall remain inviolate. A director, officer, agent or employee of a professional corporation shall not, by reason of being any director, officer, agent or employee of such corporation, be personally liable for any debts or claims against, or the acts or omissions of the corporation or of another director, officer, agent or employee of the corporation, but the corporation shall be liable for the acts or omissions of its directors, officers, agents, employees and servants to the same extent to which any other corporation would be liable for the acts or omissions of its directors, officers, agents, employees and servants while they are engaged in carrying on the corporate business.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1984, c. 448.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

For comment, “Limited Liability for Shareholders in Virginia Professional Corporations: Fact or Fiction?,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 571 (1987).

§ 13.1-548.
Corporation not to engage in other business; investment of funds.

No corporation organized under this chapter shall engage in any business other than the rendering of the professional services for which it was specifically incorporated; provided, however, nothing in this chapter or in any other provisions of existing law applicable to corporations shall be interpreted to prohibit such corporation from investing its funds in real estate, mortgages, stocks, bonds or any other type of investments, from owning real or personal property, or from exercising any other investment power granted to corporations under this title and not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1975, c. 543.